Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1206
Commission; basis for determination;
report to Legislature; legislative action.

(1) The Judicial Resources Commission's determination
of whether a judicial vacancy exists or a new judgeship, a reduction in judgeships,
a change in number of judicial districts or boundaries, or the reallocation
of a judgeship from a district, county, or separate juvenile court in one
judicial district to a district, county, or separate juvenile court in another
judicial district is appropriate pursuant to section 24-1204 or 24-1205 shall
be based upon (a) its analysis of judicial
workload statistics compiled pursuant to section 24-1007, (b) whether
litigants in the judicial district have adequate access to the courts, (c) the population of the judicial district, (d) other judicial duties and travel time involved
within the judicial district, and (e) other factors determined
by the Supreme Court to be necessary to assure efficiency and maximum service.
The State Court Administrator shall provide adequate administrative support
and information as requested by the commission.

(2) After
making a determination, the commission shall report the results electronically to the Legislature
and recommend any legislative changes which are needed. If no changes in existing
law are needed and none are recommended by the commission, no legislative
action shall be necessary to fill any judicial vacancy determined to exist.
The Legislature shall not create a new judgeship unless the commission recommends
the creation of a new judgeship in its report. If legislative action is required
but none is taken in the first legislative session commencing after receipt
of the report by the Legislature, the commission shall hold another hearing
on the matter and shall determine whether a judicial vacancy exists or again
recommend legislative changes to the Legislature in its report.

Laws 1995, LB 189, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 27.